Maine, session 132, LD2216.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §15303, sub-§7, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 109, §4, is
amended to read:
D. A program, in collaboration with the Maine Innovation Economy Advisory Board
under Title 10, section 949, to support the technology transfer activities of the
University of Maine System, other postsecondary educational institutions in the State
and nonprofit research institutes eligible for funding under an asset technology fund
established and administered by the institute, to increase the level of patenting at the
University of Maine System, other postsecondary institutions in the State and nonprofit
research institutes and to promote the licensing of the patents, especially to new and
existing companies with operations in the State. Support under this paragraph may
include expenses associated with patenting and licensing. The administrative costs of
a program under this paragraph are not management and related operating costs of the
institute under section 15305; and
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §15303, sub-§7, ¶E, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 109, §4, is
amended to read:
E. A program in collaboration with the University of Maine School of Law to support
the commercialization and manufacturing of innovations in the State by providing
education and assistance with the patent process of the United States Patent and
Trademark Office to companies, inventors and entrepreneurs in the State. The
administrative costs of a program under this paragraph are not management and related
operating costs of the institute under section 15305.; and
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §15303, sub-§7, ¶F is enacted to read:
F. The Maine Blue Economy Center pursuant to section 15331, subsection 2.
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA c. 407, sub-c. 5 is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 5
Page 1 - 132LR3009(07)

MAINE BLUE ECONOMY CENTER
§15341. Maine Blue Economy Center
1. Definitions. As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Blue economy" means the aggregate of persons engaged in any economic activity
that depends upon the sustainable use of ocean, coastal or marine resources that
optimizes innovation to retain and expand economic opportunities in the State while
maintaining or improving the long-term health of marine ecosystems, including, but
not limited to, business, manufacturing, research and education relating to commercial
fishing, sustainable aquaculture and marine vegetation cultivation, marine
biotechnology, ocean data and marine research, marine and coastal environmental
science, resilient coastal infrastructure, working waterfront access and infrastructure,
coastal ecosystem restoration and stewardship, marine recreation and tourism and
sustainable boat building or marine propulsion or other industries grounded in the
State's marine heritage, research expertise, location or traditional activities.
B. "Board" means the board of directors for the center established in subsection 3.
C. "Center" means the Maine Blue Economy Center established in subsection 2.
D. "Commercial fishing" means the harvesting or processing, or both, of wild marine
organisms from natural habitats with the intent of disposing of them for profit or trade
in commercial channels.
2. Establishment; purpose. The Maine Blue Economy Center is established within
the Maine Technology Institute to serve as the State's central coordinating entity for blue
economy sector initiatives and to work in collaboration with governmental entities, trade
associations, institutions of higher education, research institutions, nonprofit organizations,
businesses and other entities to provide for the growth of the blue economy sector. The
center shall support the sustainable development of ocean-based industries while
recognizing the importance of the Gulf of Maine ecosystem and the marine resources upon
which coastal communities and traditional marine industries depend. The center is
established to serve the following purposes:
A. To expand the State's blue economy by supporting collaborative research,
workforce training, entrepreneurial ventures, private sector investment and
commercialization of ocean-based innovations;
B. To gather and analyze data that inform decisions, measure progress, identify new
opportunities for the blue economy and monitor the health of ocean resources on which
the blue economy depends, including through the development of a blue economy
database and accessible public tools, such as an online portal and other public resources
that improve understanding of the State's blue economy;
C. To communicate ongoing and emerging trends and performance metrics for
economic activity and the health of ocean resources on which the blue economy
depends through a regular public report on the state of the State's blue economy;
Page 2 - 132LR3009(07)

D. To serve as a statewide navigator and coordinating organization for the State's blue
economy by connecting partners, aligning initiatives, strengthening communication
and reducing unnecessary duplication across public, private and nonprofit efforts;
E. To coordinate with public and private partners, educational and research
institutions, nonprofit organizations and business stakeholders to strengthen the State's
blue economy and support collaboration across ocean industries;
F. To ensure that the traditional marine industries of this State, including commercial
fishing and working waterfront activities, remain central to the State's blue economy
and are fully considered in the center's planning, partnerships and recommendations;
G. To facilitate the creation of a highly skilled workforce and support attraction and
retention of workers in the blue economy sector, including by promoting internships,
apprenticeships and other work-based learning opportunities;
H. To conduct targeted workforce analyses, including assessments of workforce
barriers, participation, outcomes and future workforce needs in the blue economy
sector;
I. To support efforts to strengthen awareness about blue economy careers and
education pathways in kindergarten to grade 12 and higher education;
J. To investigate opportunities for grants, loans and other resources to support blue
economy entities and initiatives;
K. To develop strategies to attract federal, philanthropic and private investment and to
position this State competitively for external funding;
L. To identify policy, programmatic and partnership opportunities that can support
sustainable growth across the blue economy sector;
M. To advise the president of the Maine Technology Institute designated under section
15302 on matters related to the blue economy; and
N. To report regularly to the Legislature regarding its operations, activities, outcomes
and recommendations.
3. Board of directors. The work of the center must be overseen by a board of directors
composed of 17 members, of whom 4 members are ex officio, nonvoting members as
specified in paragraph A and 13 members are appointed as specified in paragraph B. A
member appointed pursuant to paragraph B is entitled to one vote.
A. Ex officio members of the board are:
(1) The Commissioner of Economic and Community Development or the
commissioner's designee;
(2) The president of the Maine Technology Institute designated under section
15302 or the president's designee;
(3) The Chancellor of the University of Maine System or the chancellor's designee;
and
(4) The Commissioner of Marine Resources or the commissioner's designee.
B. The members of the board who are not ex officio members are appointed by the
Governor and are subject to confirmation by the Senate and must be individuals or
Page 3 - 132LR3009(07)

representatives of organizations that are in a position to advance the purposes and goals
of the center and are able to have a significant effect on improving the State's blue
economy sector. When making appointments under this paragraph, the Governor shall
consider the multidisciplinary nature of the State's blue economy sector and the
importance of diverse representation from coastal and rural communities and from
businesses and shall consult with the board of directors of the Maine Technology
Institute and the board of directors of the Finance Authority of Maine to ensure the
alignment of those appointments with the State's economic development strategies.
Membership under this paragraph must include:
(1) A representative of a business in the State with fewer than 25 employees that
is involved in the blue economy sector;
(2) A representative of a business in the State with 25 or more employees that is
involved in the blue economy sector;
(3) A representative of a nonprofit marine or ocean science research institution
based in the State that is involved in research and development in the blue economy
sector;
(4) A representative of a university, community college or trade school in the State
that is involved in the blue economy sector, including marine or coastal
environmental research in the Gulf of Maine;
(5) A representative recommended by a federally recognized Indian tribe in the
State;
(6) Two representatives of trade associations or nonprofit organizations that
support the blue economy sector, at least one of which collaborates directly with
private sector marine industries;
(7) A representative of business investors or the banking or finance sectors;
(8) A representative of a privately owned commercial fishing or working
waterfront business in the State;
(9) A municipal official of a coastal community in the State;
(10) A representative from the private sector with experience in sustainable
aquaculture or marine vegetation cultivation in the State;
(11) A representative with expertise in emerging ocean industries; and
(12) A representative of a privately owned marine recreational tourism business
or trade association.
Members of the board who are not ex officio members serve 3-year terms and may be
reappointed.
C. The Governor shall designate a chair from among the board's members who shall
preside at, set the agenda for and schedule meetings of the board.
D. Board members shall disclose any direct or indirect pecuniary interest in any matter
brought to the center and recuse themselves from any participation in the consideration
of such matters.
Page 4 - 132LR3009(07)

E. The board shall meet as often as it considers necessary to perform its work and, to
the extent practicable, the board shall conduct its work in a manner that is open and
accessible to the public. The board may conduct its work through subcommittees.
4. Operations of the center. The following provisions govern the operations of the
center.
A. The center shall coordinate its activities with relevant state agencies, marine
industry organizations, research institutions and regional economic development
organizations in order to strengthen collaboration and avoid duplication of effort across
the State's blue economy initiatives.
B. The center shall coordinate its activities with the other programs under the
jurisdiction of the Maine Technology Institute, including any programs that promote
life sciences and innovation in the State.
C. The center shall develop and implement a database composed of data that monitors
the economic performance, workforce composition and environmental and resource
trends in the Gulf of Maine that are relevant to the blue economy sector. The center
shall assess economic performance by evaluating employment data of businesses
within the blue economy sector, including wages paid to employees, the number of
businesses operating within the blue economy sector and the revenue generated by
those businesses.
D. To support its activities under this section, the center may seek outside funds,
through direct solicitation or other fundraising methods, alone or with other groups,
and may accept gifts, grants and bequests from individuals, corporations, foundations,
governmental agencies and public and private organizations and may expend those
funds for purposes consistent with this section.
5. Staff and administrative support. The Maine Technology Institute shall provide
staff as may be necessary to fulfill the center's mission and may seek assistance from other
state agencies and private entities to accomplish the goals and work of the center.
6. Annual report. The center shall submit annually to the Governor, the Executive
Director of the Legislative Council and the joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over economic development matters, no later than 120 days after the
close of the center's fiscal year, a complete report on the activities of the center. The report
must also be made available to the public. The report must include the following for that
fiscal year:
A. A description of the center's operations and an assessment of trends and
performance in the State's blue economy sector, including details on the methods used
to assess and measure the center's economic development impacts on the blue economy
sector;
B. An accounting of the center's receipts and expenditures, assets and liabilities at the
end of its fiscal year;
C. A listing of all investments, grants, loans and incentives provided by the center
during its fiscal year;
D. A statement of the center's proposed and projected activities for its ensuing fiscal
year;
Page 5 - 132LR3009(07)

E. An analysis of workforce trends, investment activity and emerging opportunities in
the State's blue economy sector;
F. The most recent data available on the size, composition and growth trends in the
State's marine economy and environment that is compiled in the center's database
pursuant to subsection 4, paragraph C; and
G. Recommendations regarding further actions that may be suitable for achieving the
purposes of this subchapter.
After reviewing the report under this subsection, the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over economic development matters may report out
legislation relating to the report.
Sec. 5. Maine Blue Economy Center; interim report. The Maine Blue
Economy Center, established pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section
15341, shall submit an interim report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over economic development matters no later than 60 days after all
members of the board of directors of the center have been appointed pursuant to Title 5,
15341, subsection 3. The interim report must include, but is not limited to, the following:
1. A strategic plan, including proposed measures of success, for the center covering the
subsequent 5-year period;
2. An operational plan identifying anticipated staff and partnership resources, proposed
tasks and expected accomplishments; and
3. A finance plan identifying general operating expenditures, anticipated task-related
and project-related expenditures and funding.
After reviewing the report under this section, the joint standing committee may report
out legislation relating to the report.
Sec. 6. Staggered terms. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5,
section 15341, subsection 3, paragraph B, with regard to the initial appointments of the
members of the board of directors of the Maine Blue Economy Center, the Governor shall
appoint 4 members to a one-year term, 5 members to a 2-year term and 4 members to a 3-
year term.
Sec. 7. Transfer. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State
Controller shall transfer $160,000 from the Administration - Attorney General, Other
Special Revenue Funds account within the Department of the Attorney General from funds
received from settlement agreements to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund no
later than June 30, 2027.
Sec. 8. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT, DEPARTMENT OF
Maine Blue Economy Center N569
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to support the operations of the Maine Blue Economy
Center.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 6 - 132LR3009(07)

All Other $0 $160,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $160,000
Page 7 - 132LR3009(07)